District of Columbia statutes.
29-1015.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Constituent limited cooperative association” or “constituent association” means a limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association that is a party to a merger.

(2)

“Surviving limited cooperative association” or “surviving association” means a limited cooperative association or foreign limited cooperative association into which one or more other domestic associations or foreign cooperatives associations are merged, whether the domestic or foreign association existed before the merger or is created by the merger.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1601 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.